Tennessee, session 114, SB0554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-108(c), is amended by deleting
the language "within thirty (30) days thereafter" and substituting "within sixty (60) days
thereafter".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0554
002080
- 1 -